Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2413
Recurrent authorization to
operate; form; contents.

A recurrent authorization
to operate shall be in a form approved by the commission and shall state in
a clear and conspicuous manner at least the following information:

(1) The date of issuance, effective date, and term of the authorization
to operate;

(2) The full and correct name and address of the institution authorized
to operate;

(3) The authority for authorization to operate and the conditions thereof;
and

(4) Any limitation of authorization to operate as deemed necessary by
the commission.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 19.